Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Chapter 8 Cemeteries and Burials

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

14 Am. Jur. 2d Cemeteries § 1 et seq.; 22A Am. Jur. 2d Dead Bodies § 1 et seq.; 71 Am. Jur. 2d State and Local Taxation § 333, 334.

Rights and remedies as between cotenants of cemetery lots respecting burials therein, 10 ALR2d 219.

Acquisition of title to ground through adverse possession by cemetery or graveyard authorities, 41 ALR2d 925.

Gift for maintenance or care of private cemetery or burial lot, or of tomb or of monument, including the erection thereof, as valid trust, 47 ALR2d 622.

Validity of public prohibition or regulation of location of cemetery, 50 ALR2d 905.

Cemetery or burial ground as nuisance, 50 ALR2d 1324.

Private or family cemeteries, 75 ALR2d 591.

Validity and effect of testamentary direction as to disposition of testator's body, 7 ALR3d 747.

To whom does title to burial lot pass on testator's death, in absence of specific provision in his will, 26 ALR3d 1425.

Liability for injury to or death of pallbearer, 48 ALR3d 1280.

Construction and application of graverobbing statutes, 52 ALR3d 701.

Enforcement of preference expressed by decedent as to disposition of his body after death, 54 ALR3d 1037.

Liability in action based upon negligence, for injury to, or death of, person going upon cemetery premises, 63 ALR3d 1252.

Disinterment in criminal cases, 63 ALR3d 1294.

Liability of cemetery in connection with conducting or supervising burial services, 42 ALR4th 1059.

Dead bodies: liability for improper manner of reinterment, 53 ALR4th 394.

Liability for desecration of graves and tombstones, 77 ALR4th 108.

14 C.J.S. Cemeteries § 2 et seq.